Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1121
Petition and summons; service.

The petitioner shall cause notice of the petition and summons to be served on the subject, the subject's attorney, if any, the subject's guardian, if any, the subject's closest relative, if known, any other person having custody and control of the subject, if known, and the department.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 21.